Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.041

Change of trustee—Discharge of outgoing trustee, when.

Where a vacancy occurs in the office of trustee under the circumstances described in RCW 11.98.039 (1) or (2), the outgoing trustee is discharged upon the agreement of all parties entitled to notice or upon the expiration of thirty days after notice is given of such vacancy as required by the applicable subsection of RCW 11.98.039, whichever occurs first, or if no notice is required under RCW 11.98.039(1), upon the date the vacancy occurs, unless before the effective date of such discharge a petition is filed under RCW 11.98.039(4) regarding the appointment or change of a trustee of the trust. Where a petition is filed under RCW 11.98.039(4) regarding the appointment or change of a trustee, the superior court having jurisdiction may discharge the trustee from the trust and may appoint a successor trustee upon such terms as the court may require.

[ 2013 c 272 s 13; 1985 c 30 s 141.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.